New York, session 2025-2026, A11092.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 100 of the economic development law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 50 to read as follows: 3 50. to submit a quarterly report on film tax credits to the governor, 4 the director of the division of the budget, the chair of the assembly 5 ways and means committee, and the chair of the senate finance committee 6 and publish such report on the department's public facing website. Such 7 report shall be filed within fifteen days after the close of the calen- 8 dar quarter for such calendar quarter. Such report shall include all 9 tax credits claimed under sections twenty-four and thirty-one, as added 10 by section twelve of part Q of chapter fifty-seven of the laws of two 11 thousand ten, of the tax law. Such report shall include, but not be 12 limited to, for each project, by name, and for each county, in the 13 aggregate: 14 (a) qualified production costs and in which counties such costs were 15 incurred. 16 (b) days of principal photography and in which counties such principal 17 photography took place. 18 (c) number of employees associated and total employees hired in 19 relation to such project and in which counties such employees reside and 20 work. 21 (d) credit-eligible work hours and in which counties such work hours 22 occurred. 23 (e) amount of tax credits issued. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 25 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09283-01-5